Florida, session 2026, SB564.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 97.0291, Florida Statutes, is amended to 14 read: 15 97.0291âProhibition on use of private funds for election 16 related expenses.â 17 (1)âAn No agency or a state or local official responsible 18 for conducting elections, including, but not limited to, a 19 supervisor of elections, may not solicit, accept, use, or 20 dispose of any donation in the form of money, grants, property, 21 or personal services from an individual or a nongovernmental 22 entity for the purpose of funding any type of expenses related 23 to election administration, including, but not limited to, voter 24 education, voter outreach, voter registration programs, or the 25 cost of any litigation related to election administration. 26 (2)âThis section does not prohibit: 27 (a)âThe donation and acceptance of space to be used for a 28 polling room or an early voting site. 29 (b)âHigh school students in this state who are registered 30 or preregistered to vote from volunteering to assist poll 31 workers for the purpose of receiving community service hours to 32 meet community service requirements for high school graduation 33 or postsecondary financial aid. 34 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.